Utah statutes.
58-28-501.   Unlawful conduct.

Unlawful conduct includes, in addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-501:

(1)  fraudulently issuing or using any health certificate, inspection certificate, vaccination certificate, test chart, or any other certificate relating to the existence of animal diseases or the sale of animal products for human consumption;

(2)  willfully misrepresenting any findings in the inspection of foodstuffs of animal origin; and

(3)  fraudulently misapplying or reporting any intradermal, cutaneous, subcutaneous, serological, or chemical test.

